California, session 20252026, AB1161.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 10507 is added to the Welfare and Institutions Code, to read:10507. (a) The State Department of Social Services shall provide continuous eligibility for the following programs to a recipient of the applicable program who has been displaced by, or who has otherwise been affected by, a state of emergency, as proclaimed by the Governor pursuant to Section 8625 of the Government Code:(1) The California Work Opportunity and Responsibility to Kids (CalWORKs) program, as described in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200) of Part 3.(2) The CalFresh program, as described in Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 18900) of Part 6.(3) The California Food Assistance Program (CFAP), as described in Chapter 10.1 (commencing with Section 18930) of Part 6, through whichever version of Section 18930 is operative.(4) The In-Home Supportive Services (IHSS) program, as described in Article 7 (commencing with Section 12300) of Chapter 3 of Part 3.(5) The Cash Assistance Program for Immigrants (CAPI) pursuant to Chapter 10.3 (commencing with Section 18937) of Part 6.(b) The continuous eligibility described in subdivision (a) shall maintain a recipient’s current scope of benefits under the applicable program for at least 90 calendar days starting from the proclamation described in subdivision (a), and shall continue through at least the conclusion of the proclamation described in subdivision (a).(c) (1) The department shall implement subdivision (b) for each recipient described in subdivision (a) through automated programming of eligibility systems to pause all discontinuances and all negative actions, without requiring manual eligibility worker action.(2) The automated programming described in paragraph (1) shall include the transmission of a notification by mail, and a notification through electronic, text, or telephonic format, that inform a recipient about their continued eligibility and about any changes to deadlines for any information required to continue eligibility after the state of emergency.(d) A county shall immediately restore eligibility for the applicable program for any recipient whose eligibility was discontinued and who informs the county that they have been impacted as described in subdivision (a), without requesting any further verifications from the recipient. The county shall accept the recipient’s attestation of their impact by any means, including, but not limited to, verbal communication.(e) (1) If a recipient described in subdivision (a) fails to submit a semiannual report for purposes of a program listed in subdivision (a), if applicable, by the end of the semiannual reporting period, or an annual redetermination or recertification of eligibility, if applicable, by the end of the annual reporting period, the county shall determine that the recipient had good cause for failing to submit that information.(2) If a discontinuance notice has been issued, the county shall rescind the notice for the full period of continuous eligibility described in subdivision (b).(3) A county shall not terminate benefits due to a failure to submit a semiannual report by the end of the semiannual reporting period if the recipient had good cause for failing to submit the report.(4) A county shall not terminate benefits due to a failure to submit an annual redetermination or recertification of eligibility by the end of the annual reporting period if the recipient had good cause for failing to submit the report.(5) To the extent permitted by federal law, the department shall seek any necessary federal waivers to suspend or defer the federal Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program (SNAP) recertification deadline for purposes of recipients described in subdivision (a), as applicable.(6) The Director of Social Services may waive, subject to receipt of any necessary federal approvals, the enforcement of specific federal requirements, regulations, or standards necessary to implement this section.(f) This section shall not be construed as limiting the Governor’s authority under the California Emergency Services Act (Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 8550) of Division 1 of Title 2 of the Government Code), or the authority of the director under any provision of this part.(g) This section shall be implemented only to the extent not in conflict with federal law.(h) The director may issue county directives in the form of all-county letters or eligibility division letters regarding compliance with this section during the first three years following the proclamation of a state of emergency, or until the state of emergency is terminated, whichever occurs first. This guidance shall not be subject to the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).SEC. 2. Section 14118 is added to the Welfare and Institutions Code, to read:14118. (a) (1) The department shall provide continuous Medi-Cal eligibility to a beneficiary who has been displaced by, or who has otherwise been affected by, who, due to a state of emergency, as proclaimed by the Governor pursuant to Section 8625 of the Government Code, or a health emergency, as declared by the State Public Health Officer pursuant to Section 101080 of the Health and Safety Code. Code, has been affected by any of the following circumstances:(A) A county welfare department operating at reduced capacity, including, but not limited to, staffing, office closures, or operation at reduced hours.(B) The beneficiary being displaced or otherwise experiencing limited freedom of movement, including, but not limited to, relocation to shelter or emergency housing, stay-at-home orders, or evacuation orders or warnings.(C) A disruption in providers, infrastructure, or other services necessary to maintain daily life and health, including, but not limited to, a disruption in utilities, school, childcare, medical services or providers, access to food, transportation, or mail services.(2) The department may implement paragraph (1) by providing continuous eligibility to all Medi-Cal beneficiaries within a geographic region where the department finds, after consulting with counties, consumer stakeholders, and the Office of Emergency Services within the office of the Governor, that multiple Medi-Cal beneficiaries within the geographic region have experienced any of the circumstances described in subparagraphs (A) to (C), inclusive, of paragraph (1), due to a proclaimed state of emergency or declared health emergency.(b) The continuous Medi-Cal eligibility described in subdivision (a) shall maintain a beneficiary’s current scope of Medi-Cal coverage coverage, for at least 90 calendar days starting from the date of the proclamation or declaration described in subdivision (a), whichever one is later, and shall continue through at least the conclusion of or through the date the proclamation or declaration described in subdivision (a), (a) is terminated, whichever one is later.(c) (1) The department shall implement subdivision (b) for each beneficiary described in subdivision (a) through automated programming of eligibility systems to pause all discontinuances and all negative actions, without requiring manual eligibility worker action.(2) The automated programming described in paragraph (1) shall include the transmission of a notification by mail, and a notification through electronic, text, or telephonic format, that inform a beneficiary about their continued Medi-Cal eligibility and about any changes to deadlines for any information required to continue Medi-Cal eligibility after the state of emergency or the health emergency, as applicable.(d) A county shall immediately restore Medi-Cal eligibility for any beneficiary whose Medi-Cal coverage was discontinued and who informs the county that they have been impacted as described in subdivision (a), without requesting any further verifications from the beneficiary. The county shall accept the beneficiary’s attestation of their impact by any means, including, but not limited to, verbal communication.(e) This section shall not be construed as limiting the Governor’s authority under the California Emergency Services Act (Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 8550) of Division 1 of Title 2 of the Government Code), or the director’s authority under any provision of this chapter.(f) (1) This section shall be implemented only to the extent not in conflict with federal law.(2) This section shall be implemented only to the extent that any necessary federal approvals are obtained and that federal financial participation is available and not otherwise jeopardized.(g) The director may issue county directives in the form of all-county letters or eligibility division letters regarding compliance with this section during the first three years following the proclamation of a state of emergency or the declaration of a health emergency, or until the state of emergency or the health emergency is terminated, whichever occurs first. This guidance shall not be subject to the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).SEC. 3. No appropriation pursuant to Section 15200 of the Welfare and Institutions Code shall be made for purposes of implementing this act.SEC. 4. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.